dict-sa-Latn/sa-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 992 Y 1
SFX 992 e iṣyanti e
SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 ā avyasya ā
SFX 962 Y 1
SFX 962 e yetām e
SFX 377 Y 1
SFX 377 ā avatī ā
SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 ḥ ṣīḥ ḥ
SFX 477 Y 1
SFX 477 ḥ ṣām ḥ
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 ā avyāni ā
SFX 412 Y 1
SFX 412 ī iṇoḥ ī
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 ā oḥ ā
SFX 985 Y 1
SFX 985 e iṣyantyaḥ e
SFX 994 Y 1
SFX 994 e iṣyantībhyaḥ e
SFX 241 Y 1
SFX 241 ā avyaiḥ ā
SFX 955 Y 1
SFX 955 ā akebhyaḥ ā
SFX 619 Y 1
SFX 619 e uṣīṣu e
SFX 712 Y 1
SFX 712 ā amānāḥ ā
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 i tha i
SFX 751 Y 1
SFX 751 ī ikāsu ī
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 ā asya ā
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 e itavyānām e
SFX 702 Y 1
SFX 702 ā amānasya ā
SFX 984 Y 1
SFX 984 e iṣyantyāḥ e
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 ā amāneṣu ā
SFX 269 Y 1
SFX 269 ā avyāyai ā
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 e uṣe e
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 ī yoḥ ī
SFX 390 Y 1
SFX 390 ā avatībhyām ā
SFX 131 Y 1
SFX 131 a ātām a
SFX 244 Y 1
SFX 244 ā avyānām ā
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 ḥ ṣaḥ ḥ
SFX 936 Y 1
SFX 936 a ānaḥ a
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 e vatsu e
SFX 128 Y 1
SFX 128 ī oḥ ī
SFX 720 Y 1
SFX 720 ā amānāni ā
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 ā avyābhiḥ ā
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 ū ubhyām ū
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 ā akābhyām ā
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 a āne a
SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 ū uḥ ū
SFX 722 Y 1
SFX 722 ā amānā ā
SFX 934 Y 1
SFX 934 a ānān a
SFX 890 Y 1
SFX 890 e itavyābhiḥ e
SFX 697 Y 1
SFX 697 ā amāne ā
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 a ānataḥ a
SFX 324 Y 1
SFX 324 ā avadbhiḥ ā
SFX 997 Y 1
SFX 997 e iṣyantam e
SFX 813 Y 1
SFX 813 e yam e
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 ā asva ā
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 ī ikā ī
SFX 930 Y 1
SFX 930 ā akam ā
SFX 388 Y 1
SFX 388 ā avatīm ā
SFX 91 Y 1
SFX 91 e he e
SFX 750 Y 1
SFX 750 ī ikayā ī
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 e iṣyantīṣu e
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 e iṣyantyai e
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 ā avyataḥ ā
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 a āte a
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 ḥ ṣe ḥ
SFX 607 Y 1
SFX 607 ḥ yoḥ ḥ
SFX 622 Y 1
SFX 622 e uṣīḥ e
SFX 963 Y 1
SFX 963 e iṣyat e
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 e iṣyantī e
SFX 956 Y 1
SFX 956 e iṣyate e
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 ā antām ā
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 ū unā ū
SFX 875 Y 1
SFX 875 e itāsmi e
SFX 738 Y 1
SFX 738 ī ikāyāḥ ī
SFX 807 Y 1
SFX 807 e īyāt e
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 i maḥ i
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 ī ikāḥ ī
SFX 635 Y 1
SFX 635 e uṣoḥ e
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 ā avyābhyām ā
SFX 854 Y 1
SFX 854 e itavyāḥ e
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 ā avyāsu ā
SFX 514 Y 1
SFX 514 ī ikayoḥ ī
SFX 386 Y 1
SFX 386 ā avatīṣu ā
SFX 843 Y 1
SFX 843 e itavyebhyaḥ e
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 n se n
SFX 888 Y 1
SFX 888 e itavyā e
SFX 871 Y 1
SFX 871 e īyasya e
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 ā avatam ā
SFX 484 Y 1
SFX 484 ā ante ā
SFX 686 Y 1
SFX 686 e vat e
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 ḥ ṣīṇām ḥ
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 a ānāya a
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 e itavyābhyaḥ e
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 ā amānāsu ā
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 u yoḥ u
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 ā avya ā
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 ṛ rā ṛ
SFX 124 Y 1
SFX 124 e oḥ e
SFX 567 Y 1
SFX 567 e ima e
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 i oḥ i
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 ā avyayā ā
SFX 446 Y 1
SFX 446 e ye e
SFX 834 Y 1
SFX 834 e itavya e
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 ī ikāyām ī
SFX 869 Y 1
SFX 869 e īyebhyaḥ e
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 ḥ ṣyai ḥ
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 ā avyebhyaḥ ā
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 e iṣyatoḥ e
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 e itavyau e
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 ī ibhyaḥ ī
SFX 844 Y 1
SFX 844 e itavyayoḥ e
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 u ye u
SFX 849 Y 1
SFX 849 e itavyasya e
SFX 573 Y 1
SFX 573 e iva e
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 e uṣīm e
SFX 382 Y 1
SFX 382 ā avatyai ā
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 ū voḥ ū
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 e itavyāni e
SFX 885 Y 1
SFX 885 e itavyāsu e
SFX 831 Y 1
SFX 831 e yasya e
SFX 214 Y 1
SFX 214 u ve u
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 ā ayā ā
SFX 623 Y 1
SFX 623 e uṣī e
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 ā avatyāḥ ā
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 ā avyeṣu ā
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 ā amānayā ā
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 ī iṇe ī
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 ā avadbhyām ā
SFX 815 Y 1
SFX 815 a ānam a
SFX 823 Y 1
SFX 823 a āneṣu a
SFX 571 Y 1
SFX 571 ā ari ā
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 ū uṣu ū
SFX 881 Y 1
SFX 881 e itavyāyām e
SFX 523 Y 1
SFX 523 ṛ roḥ ṛ
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 a hāḥ a
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 e hāḥ e
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 ī iḥ ī
SFX 828 Y 1
SFX 828 e īye e
SFX 384 Y 1
SFX 384 ā avatyaḥ ā
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 ḥ ṣyaḥ ḥ
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 ā avye ā
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 e itavyayā e
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 ī ikām ī
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 ū utaḥ ū
SFX 562 Y 1
SFX 562 e idhve e
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 a ān a
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 ḥ ṣībhiḥ ḥ
SFX 631 Y 1
SFX 631 e vaḥ e
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 ī ikābhiḥ ī
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 ā ayoḥ ā
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 ā aṃ ā
SFX 617 Y 1
SFX 617 e uṣyaḥ e
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 i vaḥ i
SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302 ā avataḥ ā
SFX 982 Y 1
SFX 982 e iṣyantyām e
SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 u vaḥ u
SFX 821 Y 1
SFX 821 a ānaiḥ a
SFX 688 Y 1
SFX 688 e vāṃsau e
SFX 701 Y 1
SFX 701 ā amānayoḥ ā
SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421 ā abhiḥ ā
SFX 380 Y 1
SFX 380 ā avatyau ā
SFX 662 Y 1
SFX 662 ā amānām ā
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 e itārau e
SFX 517 Y 1
SFX 517 ā um ā
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 ṛ re ṛ
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 ī inā ī
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 ā avyāḥ ā
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 ā avan ā
SFX 321 Y 1
SFX 321 ā avatsu ā
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 e iṣyantaḥ e
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 ī yā ī
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 ā avyā ā
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 e uṣi e
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 ī iṇi ī
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 n ṇām n
SFX 715 Y 1
SFX 715 ā amānān ā
SFX 812 Y 1
SFX 812 a ānena a
SFX 641 Y 1
SFX 641 a āthe a
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 ḥ ṣīṣu ḥ
SFX 60 Y 1
SFX 60 ī yām ī
SFX 820 Y 1
SFX 820 a ānānām a
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 a āni a
SFX 696 Y 1
SFX 696 e itā e
SFX 564 Y 1
SFX 564 e ivahe e
SFX 572 Y 1
SFX 572 n ṇi n
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 ā avatoḥ ā
SFX 866 Y 1
SFX 866 e itāsi e
SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301 ā avat ā
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 ī ikābhyām ī
SFX 691 Y 1
SFX 691 e vāṃsi e
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 e yayoḥ e
SFX 872 Y 1
SFX 872 e īyaiḥ e
SFX 979 Y 1
SFX 979 e iṣyatā e
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 ā amānāt ā
SFX 569 Y 1
SFX 569 ṛ ṝn ṛ
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 ā abhyām ā
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 i mi i
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 e itavyān e
SFX 964 Y 1
SFX 964 e iṣyatām e
SFX 960 Y 1
SFX 960 e iṣyati e
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 ā avanti ā
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 e uṣībhyām e
SFX 873 Y 1
SFX 873 ā akayoḥ ā
SFX 576 Y 1
SFX 576 ā atā ā
SFX 868 Y 1
SFX 868 e īyeṣu e
SFX 211 Y 1
SFX 211 ī iṇā ī
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 e iṣyantīm e
SFX 379 Y 1
SFX 379 ā avatyoḥ ā
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 ā ate ā
SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 ī ibhiḥ ī
SFX 614 Y 1
SFX 614 e uṣyām e
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 a āṇi a
SFX 899 Y 1
SFX 899 n su n
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 ḥ ṣībhyām ḥ
SFX 965 Y 1
SFX 965 e iṣyāmi e
SFX 21 Y 1
SFX 21 a ānām a
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 e ike e
SFX 876 Y 1
SFX 876 e itāsmaḥ e
SFX 795 Y 1
SFX 795 e yābhyām e
